Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201453-103.05
Brewpub, defined.

Brewpub
means any restaurant or hotel which produces on its premises a maximum of twenty thousand barrels of beer per year.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB780, § 1.